Maine, session 132, LD752.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 18-C MRSA §5-204, sub-§2, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 340, §1, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (1) to read:
(1) The parent is currently unwilling or unable to meet the minor's needs and that
will have a substantial adverse effect on the minor's well-being if the minor lives
with the parent;, including but not limited to the situation of an adult living in the
child's home who has:
(a) Been convicted of a crime of violence of any classification as described in
Title 17-A, sections 4 and 4-A, including but not limited to Class D domestic
violence assault under Title 17-A, section 207-A; and
(b) No documented record of successful completion of a certified domestic
violence intervention program as described in Title 19‑A, section 4116,
subsection 1 or a comparable program of counseling or treatment for domestic
violence.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§6, ¶C, as amended by PL 1983, c. 184, §2, is further
amended to read:
C. Abandonment of the child or absence of any person responsible for the child, which
creates a threat of serious harm; or
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§6, ¶D, as corrected by RR 2021, c. 2, Pt. B, §178,
is amended to read:
D. The end of voluntary placement, when the imminent return of the child to the child's
custodian causes a threat of serious harm.; or
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§6, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. An adult living in the child's home who has:
(1) Been convicted of a crime of violence of any classification as described in Title
17-A, sections 4 and 4-A, including but not limited to Class D domestic violence
assault under Title 17-A, section 207-A; and
(2) No documented record of successful completion of a certified domestic
violence intervention program as described in Title 19‑A, section 4116, subsection
1 or a comparable program of counseling or treatment for domestic violence.
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§10, ¶B, as amended by PL 1985, c. 739, §3, is
further amended to read:
B. Serious mental or emotional injury or impairment which that now or in the future
is likely to be evidenced by serious mental, behavioral or personality disorder,
including severe anxiety, depression or withdrawal, untoward aggressive behavior,
seriously delayed development or similar serious dysfunctional behavior; or
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§10, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1979, c. 733, §18, is
amended to read:
C. Sexual abuse or exploitation.; or
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §4002, sub-§10, ¶D is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1480(01)

D. The situation of an adult living in the child's home who has:
(1) Been convicted of a crime of violence of any classification as described in Title
17-A, sections 4 and 4-A, including but not limited to Class D domestic violence
assault under Title 17-A, section 207-A; and
(2) No documented record of successful completion of a certified domestic
violence intervention program as described in Title 19‑A, section 4116, subsection
1 or a comparable program of counseling or treatment for domestic violence.
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §4035, sub-§2-B is enacted to read:
2-B. Conviction or adjudication for crimes of violence; presumption. There is a
rebuttable presumption:
A. That the person seeking custody or contact with the child would create a situation
of jeopardy for the child if any contact were to be permitted and that contact is not in
the best interest of the child if the court finds that the person has:
(1) Been convicted or adjudicated of a crime of violence of any classification as
described in Title 17-A, sections 4 and 4-A, including but not limited to Class D
domestic violence assault under Title 17-A, section 207-A; and
(2) No documented record of successful completion of a certified domestic
violence intervention program as described in Title 19‑A, section 4116, subsection
1 or a comparable program of counseling or treatment for domestic violence.
The person seeking custody or contact with the child may produce evidence to rebut
the presumption under this paragraph; and
B. That the parent or person responsible for the child would create a situation of
jeopardy for the child if the parent or person allows, encourages or fails to prevent
contact between the child and a person who has:
(1) Been convicted or adjudicated of a crime of violence of any classification as
described in Title 17-A, sections 4 and 4-A, including but not limited to Class D
domestic violence assault under Title 17-A, section 207-A; and
(2) No documented record of successful completion of a certified domestic
violence intervention program as described in Title 19‑A, section 4116, subsection
1 or a comparable program of counseling or treatment for domestic violence.
The parent or person responsible for the child may produce evidence to rebut the
presumption under this paragraph.